ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 13866 (affects 6969 words, has 101 subrules):
flag z:
	G A	>	-A,USE
	G A	>	-A,USED
	G A	>	-A,USEDKI
	G A	>	-A,USEGA
	G A	>	-A,USEGAGI
	G A	>	-A,USEGI
	G A	>	-A,USEID
	G A	>	-A,USEIDKI
	G A	>	-A,USEIGA
	G A	>	-A,USEIGAGI
	G A	>	-A,USEIKS
	G A	>	-A,USEIKSKI
	G A	>	-A,USEIL
	G A	>	-A,USEILE
	G A	>	-A,USEILEGI
	G A	>	-A,USEILGI
	G A	>	-A,USEILT
	G A	>	-A,USEILTKI
	G A	>	-A,USEINA
	G A	>	-A,USEINAGI
	G A	>	-A,USEINI
	G A	>	-A,USEINIGI
	G A	>	-A,USEIS
	G A	>	-A,USEISKI
	G A	>	-A,USEISSE
	G A	>	-A,USEISSEGI
	G A	>	-A,USEIST
	G A	>	-A,USEISTKI
	G A	>	-A,USEITA
	G A	>	-A,USEITAGI
	G A	>	-A,USEKS
	G A	>	-A,USEKSKI
	G A	>	-A,USEL
	G A	>	-A,USELE
	G A	>	-A,USELEGI
	G A	>	-A,USELGI
	G A	>	-A,USELT
	G A	>	-A,USELTKI
	G A	>	-A,USENA
	G A	>	-A,USENAGI
	G A	>	-A,USENI
	G A	>	-A,USENIGI
	G A	>	-A,USES
	G A	>	-A,USESKI
	G A	>	-A,USESSE
	G A	>	-A,USESSEGI
	G A	>	-A,USEST
	G A	>	-A,USESTKI
	G A	>	-A,USETA
	G A	>	-A,USETAGI
	G A	>	-A,USI
	G A	>	-A,USIGA
	G A	>	-A,USIGAGI
	G A	>	-A,USIGI
	G A	>	-A,USIKS
	G A	>	-A,USIKSKI
	G A	>	-A,USIL
	G A	>	-A,USILE
	G A	>	-A,USILEGI
	G A	>	-A,USILGI
	G A	>	-A,USILT
	G A	>	-A,USILTKI
	G A	>	-A,USINA
	G A	>	-A,USINAGI
	G A	>	-A,USINI
	G A	>	-A,USINIGI
	G A	>	-A,USIS
	G A	>	-A,USISKI
	G A	>	-A,USISSE
	G A	>	-A,USISSEGI
	G A	>	-A,USIST
	G A	>	-A,USISTKI
	G A	>	-A,USITA
	G A	>	-A,USITAGI
	G A	>	-A,USTE
	G A	>	-A,USTEGA
	G A	>	-A,USTEGAGI
	G A	>	-A,USTEGI
	G A	>	-A,USTEKS
	G A	>	-A,USTEKSKI
	G A	>	-A,USTEL
	G A	>	-A,USTELE
	G A	>	-A,USTELEGI
	G A	>	-A,USTELGI
	G A	>	-A,USTELT
	G A	>	-A,USTELTKI
	G A	>	-A,USTENA
	G A	>	-A,USTENAGI
	G A	>	-A,USTENI
	G A	>	-A,USTENIGI
	G A	>	-A,USTES
	G A	>	-A,USTESKI
	G A	>	-A,USTESSE
	G A	>	-A,USTESSEGI
	G A	>	-A,USTEST
	G A	>	-A,USTESTKI
	G A	>	-A,USTETA
	G A	>	-A,USTETAGI
	U D	>	-D,GI
	U D	>	-D,TA
	U D	>	-D,TAGI
