ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
adsorbeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ahhetanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
aimelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
aktiveerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
aletanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ammendunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ankeetinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
arendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
artikuleerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
asinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
asutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
autoriseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
barrikadeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
bürokraaditsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
dekvalifitseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
desorienteerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
diskrediteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
dresseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eendunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ekutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
emmanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eranud/acijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
esildanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
evinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
filtreerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
formeerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
galopeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
grimassitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
habisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hakatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hallunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hapatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
harjunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
haudunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hekseldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
helgunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hepitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hilpnenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hirnatlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hooldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
huikunud/afijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hullutsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hädatsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hämmeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
häälestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hõiselnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hõõganud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hülpinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hüüdnud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ihitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ilatsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
imendunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
importinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
inkorporeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
internatsionaliseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
itsitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
janunenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
joonud/aceijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jupastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jätkanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jörisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kabanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kahminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kalgistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kanoniseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
karmistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kaubelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kehastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kepsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kidunenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kiimanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kiljatelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kirgastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kivitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
klugisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kogelnud/abcdfhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kohutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kombaininud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
konjugeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
konvertinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
koonud/aeikntwz
kopitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kortsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kraksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kristallinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
krägistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kuivatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kummastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kurvatsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kädistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
käratsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
käuksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõhnud/aiklmnopvyz
kõmmutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõrvutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kööbanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kündnud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ladestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lahterdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
laksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
larpinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
leemetanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lentsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lihtsustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
liitnud/achijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lipsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
logisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
longunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
loputanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lukustunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
läbinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lärmitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lõhverdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lõuanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
lööbinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
magnetiseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mangunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mattunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
metallitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mossitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mullastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mädandanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
määginud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mõrastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
müdistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
müünud/aceijklmnopqrstuvwyz
najatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
neednud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
niksutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
noominud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nullinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
näidanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
närutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nõksanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nördinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
oianud/acijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
opereerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
paaristunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
paiknenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pallinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pareerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
patserdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pehmitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pigistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pikettinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pingutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
plaasterdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
plokkinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
poetanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
poputanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
prakeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
proovinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pudistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
puksinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
purdunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
puuderdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
põdenud/afijklmnopqrstuvwyz
põnksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pöörelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rabenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
raketanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rasvatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
reevakueerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rentinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rigisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ripnenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rohtunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ropsatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rägisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rõivastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rühelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sadanud/abdfgijklmnopqrstuvwyz
saluteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sarvestunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sehkendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
separeerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sihvanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sinerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sisenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sodistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
songinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sopsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
spikerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
suhelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sulksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
surtsutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sähmanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sõbrutsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sõudnud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sürjutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tahkestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tammistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tarretanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
teietanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tervenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tiksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tirisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tolmeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tormanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
triibustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tudeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tuiselnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tunnustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tuurinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
täpsustunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tõrjunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tühistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ubinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
uljutsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
usurpeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vabisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vaianud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
valjastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vapelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vedeldunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
verdunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vihjanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viivitelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vinanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
virtsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vollinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vulistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
väisanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
värskenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võidnud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võrdsustunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ähelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
õgvendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
õnnitlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ühtinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
